Wisconsin, session 2025, SB86.
do enact as follows:Joint Legislative Council prefatory note: This bill was prepared for the Joint Legislative Council’s Special Committee on State-Tribal Relations.Under current law, a financial institution, state agency, county department, Wisconsin Works agency, service office, or long-term care district or an employee of any of these entities are exempt from penalties that would otherwise apply for copying a certified copy of a vital record if the copy is for use by the authorized entity and the copy is marked “FOR ADMINISTRATIVE USE.”This bill adds tribal governments of a federally recognized American Indian tribe or band in this state and employees of tribal governments to the list of entities and persons who are authorized to copy a certified copy of a vital record for administrative use by the authorized entity.SB86,11Section 1. 69.30 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB86,2,3269.30 (1) (cm) “Tribal government” means the government of a federally 3recognized American Indian tribe or band in this state.SB86,24Section 2. 69.30 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB86,2,12569.30 (2) A financial institution, state agency, tribal government, county 6department, Wisconsin works agency, service office, or long-term care district or an 7employee of a financial institution, state agency, tribal government, county 8department, Wisconsin works agency, service office, or long-term care district is not 9subject to s. 69.24 (1) (a) for copying a certified copy of a vital record for use by the 10financial institution, state agency, tribal government, county department, 11Wisconsin works agency, service office, or long-term care district, including use 12under s. 45.04 (5), if the copy is marked “FOR ADMINISTRATIVE USE”.SB86,2,1313